Hawaii statutes.
§606-1 Clerks of supreme court,
intermediate appellate court, circuit courts, and district courts; appointment
and removal. (a) Subject to the provisions of chapter 76, when
applicable:

(1) There shall be a clerk of the supreme court and
as many deputy clerks and assistant clerks as the business of the supreme court
requires, appointed and removable by the justices of the supreme court.

(2) There shall be a clerk of the intermediate
appellate court and as many deputy clerks and assistant clerks as the business
of such court requires, appointed and removable by the judges of the
intermediate appellate court.

(3) There shall be as many clerks of the circuit
courts as may be necessary, appointed and removable by the judge or
administrative judge thereof, as the case may be. The appointment of a clerk
of a particular division may be made by the judge of that division.

(4) There shall be as many clerks of the district
courts as may be necessary, appointed and removable by the judge or
administrative judge thereof, as the case may be.

(b) The respective clerks of the supreme
court, intermediate appellate court, circuit courts, and district courts shall
be ex officio clerks of all the courts of records, and as such may issue
process returnable in all such courts. [L 1892, c 57, §59; am L 1903, c 32,
§16; am L 1907, c 54, §1; am L 1911, c 84, §1; RL 1925, §2291; RL 1935, §3690;
RL 1945, §9721; RL 1955, §218-1; am L 1965, c 104, §1; HRS §606-1; am L 1970, c
188, §25; am L 1972, c 88, §4(a); am L 1979, c 111, §4(1)]

Case Notes

Powers of deputy clerks, in absence of clerk, to select
jurors and issue process under former statutes. 7 H. 388; 9 H. 522, 540 (1894).

Authority of clerks discussed. 8 H. 191 (1890).

Removal of deputy for misconduct, etc., requires opportunity
to be heard, disloyalty to government is cause for removal. 9 H. 681 (1893).

Where more judges than one in a circuit, appointment or
removal of a clerk requires presence, actual or constructive, of all and
concurrent action of majority. 22 H. 557, 568 (1915).

Cited: 32 H. 995, 997 (1934).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next